Utah statutes.
49-21-404.   Annual adjustment to disability benefit.

(1) (a)  An eligible employee receiving a monthly disability benefit shall receive an annual adjustment on the date following the end of the elimination period to reflect annual changes in the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index average as determined by the board.

(b)  This adjustment may not exceed adjustments made to retirees under the system which covered the eligible employee on the date of disability.

(2)  If an employee is not participating in a system, the annual adjustment may not exceed the adjustment paid in the system which would cover the employee if the employee were participating in a system.



Amended by Chapter 240, 2003 General Session

